Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-295
Township organization;
discontinuance; when effective.

If a majority of the votes
cast on the question are for the discontinuance of
township organization, then such organization shall cease to exist effective
at the expiration of the supervisors' terms of office in January of the third
calendar year following such election.

Laws 1885, c. 43, § 4, p. 236;

R.S.1913, § 1059;

C.S.1922, § 961;

C.S.1929, § 26-275;

R.S.1943, § 23-295;

Laws 2008, LB269, § 8;

Laws 2009, LB434, § 3.